Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201616-219
Officers; bonds or insurance; restrictions upon officers as sureties.

A city of the first class by ordinance may require all officers, elected or appointed, to give bond and security or evidence of equivalent insurance for the faithful performance of their duties. No officer shall become surety upon the official bond of another, or upon any contractor's bond, license, or appeal bond given to the city, or under any ordinance thereof, or from conviction in the county court for violation of any ordinance of such city.

Laws 1901, c. 18, § 48, XXIV, p. 250;

R.S.1913, § 4835;

C.S.1922, § 4003;

C.S.1929, § 16-220;

R.S.1943, § 16-219;

Laws 1972, LB 1032, § 102;

Laws 2007, LB347, § 8;

Laws 2016, LB704, § 25.
July 21, 2016